District of Columbia statutes.
47-1811.03

Bases — Property dividends.

Where any property other than money is paid by a corporation as a dividend, the base to the recipient thereof shall be the market value of such property at the time of its distribution by such corporation.

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 351, ch. 258, art. I, title XI, § 4
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1811.3.
1973 Ed., § 47-1583c.